District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-2096

Remedy not exclusive.

Repealed.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-204, § 7, 37 DCR 8439
July 25, 1995, D.C. Law 11-30, § 5(b), 42 DCR 1547
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 3(b), 53 DCR 9063
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 308, 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 21-2096.

D.C. Law 17-353, § 308, made a technical correction in the repeal of this section by D.C. Law 16-205, § 3(b).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act.